Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.40.130

Personal use of contributions—When permitted. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

Contributions received and reported in accordance with RCW 29B.25.060 through 29B.25.100 and 29B.40.080 may only be paid to a candidate, or a treasurer or other individual or expended for such individual's personal use under the following circumstances:

(1) Reimbursement for or payments to cover lost earnings incurred as a result of campaigning or services performed for the political committee. Lost earnings shall be verifiable as unpaid salary, or when the individual is not salaried, as an amount not to exceed income received by the individual for services rendered during an appropriate, corresponding time period. All lost earnings incurred shall be documented and a record shall be maintained by the candidate or the candidate's authorized committee in accordance with RCW 29B.25.090.

(2) Reimbursement for direct out-of-pocket election campaign and postelection campaign related expenses made by the individual. For example, expenses for child care or other direct caregiving responsibilities may be reimbursed if they are incurred directly as a result of the candidate's campaign activities. To receive reimbursement from the political committee, the individual shall provide the political committee with written documentation as to the amount, date, and description of each expense, and the political committee shall include a copy of such information when its expenditure for such reimbursement is reported pursuant to RCW 29B.25.100.

(3) Repayment of loans made by the individual to political committees shall be reported pursuant to RCW 29B.25.100. However, contributions may not be used to reimburse a candidate for loans totaling more than *four thousand seven hundred dollars made by the candidate to the candidate's own authorized committee.

[ 2024 c 164 s 455; 2022 c 174 s 1; 2010 c 204 s 608; 1995 c 397 s 29; 1993 c 2 s 21 (Initiative Measure No. 134, approved November 3, 1992); 1989 c 280 s 12; 1985 c 367 s 7; 1977 ex.s. c 336 s 6. Formerly RCW 42.17A.445, 42.17.125.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The dollar amounts in this section may have been adjusted for inflation by rule of the commission adopted under the authority of RCW 29B.20.050. For current dollar amounts, see WAC 390-05-400.

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Effective date—1995 c 397: See note following RCW 29B.40.020.

Short title—1993 c 2: See note following RCW 29B.40.010.

Effective date—1989 c 280: See note following RCW 29B.25.020.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 336: See note following RCW 29B.25.020.